Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1623
Agent's permit; commissioner; grant or deny.

Following review of an application for an agent's permit and any further information submitted by the applicant or required by the department and following such investigation of the applicant as the department may deem necessary or appropriate, the commissioner shall either grant or deny an agent's permit to the applicant.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 23;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 23;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2823;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 23.